Idaho, session 2026, H0650.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2364, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2364. STATE SOVEREIGNTY AND JURISDICTIONAL PRESUMPTION -- LIMITA-
TIONS ON FEDERAL POWER. (1) The legislature finds and declares that:
(a) Under the ninth and tenth amendments to the constitution of the
United States and section 1, article I of the constitution of the state
of Idaho, all powers not delegated to the federal government are re-
served to the states respectively or to the people;
(b) The state of Idaho asserts its sovereignty and reserves all powers
not expressly granted to the federal government by the constitution of
the United States; and
(c) The proper balance of authority between the state of Idaho and the
federal government is essential to protecting the liberties of the peo-
ple of Idaho.
(2) It is the policy of the state of Idaho that jurisdiction over all
matters arising within the state shall be presumed to reside with the state
unless the federal government demonstrates that the constitution of the
United States expressly and specifically delegates such jurisdiction to the
federal government. Such presumption may be rebutted only by a clear showing
that the federal government's exercise of jurisdiction is authorized pur-
suant to the text of the constitution of the United States.
(3) Areas in which the state has primary and inherent police power ju-
risdiction shall include but are not limited to:
(a) Public health and safety;
(b) Education;
(c) Water and natural resources, excluding federal reserve water
rights;
(d) Agriculture;
(e) Energy;
(f) Land use and zoning; and
(g) Local economic regulation.
(4) The federal government is a government of limited and enumerated
powers. Any assertion of authority based on implied, incidental, or ancil-


lary powers shall be narrowly construed and shall not overcome the presump-
tion of state jurisdiction established in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) In any conflict between the state and federal government regard-
ing jurisdiction, the state of Idaho shall assert its rights in coordina-
tion with the office of the attorney general, the governor, and the legisla-
ture. The burden shall be on the federal government to establish the consti-
tutional basis for any asserted jurisdiction.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.